Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1411.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1402.1. School-Based Health Centers.--(a) A school-based health center shall comply with the following standards:(1) A school-based health center:(i) Shall be open and staffed during the regular hours of the school facility in which the school-based health center is located or which is near the school-based health center.(ii) May not turn away a student due to an inability to pay.(iii) May not decline care to a student due to insurance status, health status or existence of a current primary health 1234567891011121314151617181920 care provider of a student. If the student:(A) Has a primary health care provider, the school-based health center shall make every effort to coordinate services with the student's primary health care provider to avoid any duplication of services.(B) Is covered under an insurance policy, the school-based health center may seek reimbursement under the student's insurance.(2) A school-based health center shall make a complete range of health care services available to any student who enrolls if the student obtained parental consent, is eighteen (18) years of age or is otherwise able to provide consent based on the laws of this Commonwealth.(3) When providing services by referral, a health care provider shall minimize financial, geographical and other barriers to the greatest extent possible.(4) A school-based health center shall make consent forms available to each enrolling student to obtain informed written consent of the parent or legal guardian of the student as required under the laws of this Commonwealth. Consent forms shall include a complete list of the specific services provided at the school-based health center.(b) A health care provider, through cooperation with a participating school, shall make written information about school-based health center services available to parents and legal guardians of students, including:(1) The scope of services offered.(2) Opt-in instructions.(3) The ability of the school-based health center to serve as the designated primary health care provider or provide 20260SB1411PN1880 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 services in collaboration with the student's primary health care provider.(4) Staffing patterns.(c) Services provided by a school-based health center shall be determined by, in the case of a public school, the school board of the district or, in the case of a private school or parochial school, the private governing body. The school board of the school district or the private governing body shall consider conducting an assessment of a participating school district's, private school's or parochial school's student population needs and shall be sensitive to:(1) The age of students served.(2) The racial demographics and ethnic backgrounds of students.(3) The availability, use and access to other school and community resources.(4) The size of the enrolled population of the school-based health center.(d) If a school establishes a school-based health center, the school-based health center shall be integrated into the school environment and plans and shall coordinate health care services with school administration, teachers, the certified school nurse, support or other school personnel and other community providers at the school.(e) A school-based health center, in partnership with a participating school and other service providers at the school, shall develop policies and systems to ensure confidentiality in the sharing of medical information in accordance with the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191, 110 Stat. 1936).20260SB1411PN1880 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the department may promulgate regulations regarding school-based health centers to meet the requirements of this section according to the following:(1) The department shall solicit input from the advisory council and stakeholders in developing regulations under this section.(2) The department may not require a school district, private school or parochial school to offer services in a school-based health center which the school district or governing body of the private school or parochial school has not itself approved.(g) The department shall establish a school-based health center liaison position within the department who shall facilitate communication with school-based health centers.(h) A Statewide school-based health advisory council is established within the department and in accordance with the following:(1) The advisory council shall consist of the following members, which shall be appointed by the Governor unless otherwise stated:(i) Two department representatives, appointed by the Secretary of Health.(ii) The school-based health center liaison, established under subsection (g).(iii) Three experts in the field of school-based health centers.(iv) Two students who attend a school that established a school-based health center.(v) Two parents of a child of school age at a school that 20260SB1411PN1880 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 established a school-based health center.(vi) One member of the administration of a school district that established a school-based health center.(vii) Two certified school nurses.(viii) One member of the administration of a private school or parochial school that established a school-based health center.(ix) Two community members of communities where a school-based health center was established.(x) Two health care providers who work in a school-based health center.(2) Members of the advisory council shall serve two-year terms.(3) The advisory council shall:(i) Provide guidance on the operation and community integration of school-based health centers.(ii) Encourage school-based health centers to convene advisory groups at the school level to gain nuanced insight on each school.(iii) Participate in the planning and development of school-based health center policies.(iv) Participate in the identification of emerging health issues and appropriate interventions.(v) Provide advocacy for the availability of school-based health centers.(i) (1) The department shall collect and track outcome data, including:(i) School-based health center utilization by:(A) Number of students served.(B) Visits and type of visits.20260SB1411PN1880 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) Racial and ethnic demographics of students served.(D) Visit billing information.(ii) Racial, ethnic and socioeconomic health disparity data.(iii) Expansion of health insurance coverage.(iv) Efforts to raise public and health care provider awareness of racial and ethnic disparities in health care.(v) Causes and interventions to reduce health disparities.(vi) Health and academic outcomes of students.(2) The department shall report the data collected under paragraph (1) to the General Assembly and post the data on its publicly accessible Internet website.(j) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Advisory council." The school-based health advisory council established under subsection (h)."Certified school nurse." An educator holding a valid certificate as a school nurse that is qualified to provide information and services in school health-related areas, including assessing, documenting and managing the health care needs of students in pre-kindergarten through grade twelve, including students with disabilities, and recognizing symptoms and consequences of safety and environmental factors related to student health."Complete range of services." Services permissible under law and specifically approved by a school board of the district, in the case of public schools, or a private governing body, in the case of private schools and parochial schools."Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Health care provider." A person, corporation, facility, 20260SB1411PN1880 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 institution or other entity licensed, certified or approved by the Commonwealth to provide health care or professional medical services. The term includes a physician, podiatrist, optometrist, psychologist, psychiatrist, physical therapist, certified nurse practitioner, nurse midwife, physicians assistant, chiropractor, dentist, pharmacist or an individual accredited or certified to provide behavioral health services."School." A public school, private school or parochial school."School-based health center." A health clinic that:(1) Is located in or near a school facility.(2) Is organized through school and health care provider relationships.(3) Provides, through licensed professionals, primary health services to students, which may include:(i) Social services.(ii) Health education.(iii) Comprehensive health assessments, including diagnosis and treatment of minor, acute and chronic medical conditions, immunizations and physical exams.(iv) Referrals to and follow-up for specialty care and oral and vision health services, mental health and substance use disorder assessments.(v) Crisis intervention, counseling, treatment and referral to a continuum of mental health and substance use disorder services, including emergency psychiatric care, risk behavior services, community support programs, inpatient care and outpatient programs.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1411PN1880 - 7 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829